Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 1 State Library

29-1-1.
Library established — State librarian.

Within the department of state there shall be a state library and, for the supervision of the state library, the secretary of state shall appoint a state librarian qualified by training and experience who shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary of state. The state librarian shall carry out the duties required by chapters 1 — 3 of this title. The state librarian shall continue to maintain and supervise the legislative reference bureau.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-1

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 4.

29-1-2.
Care of library — Preservation of books and documents.

The secretary of state shall have the care and custody of the state library, except the law library, and shall receive and preserve all books and documents that may be sent to, or purchased for, the library.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 862, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-2

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 22.

29-1-3.
Clerical assistance.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for clerical service in the state library, and the state librarian is hereby authorized and empowered to employ additional clerical assistance. The state controller shall draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of all sums appropriated under the authority of this section, or so much thereof as may be from time to time required, upon his or her receipt of proper vouchers approved by the state librarian and the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 2; P.L. 1905, ch. 1252, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1350, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 2; P.L. 1909, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 1910, ch. 592, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1095, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1499, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1747, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1915, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2223, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 2; P.L. 1925, ch. 622, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 1019, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-3

.

29-1-4.
Annual report to general assembly.

The secretary of state shall annually, at the January session, make report to the general assembly of the condition of the library, and shall make such recommendations as he or she may deem advisable for the welfare thereof, and of the books purchased during the year preceding, and of the cost thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 862, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-4

.

29-1-5.
Exchange of publications with agencies outside state.

It shall be the duty of the state librarian to exchange with such nations, states, municipalities, institutions, and persons outside the state as may confer a corresponding benefit, copies of the laws, law reports, reports of departments and institutions, and all other books and pamphlets published by the state, and to distribute these publications to such other nations, states, municipalities, institutions, and persons outside the state as may, by law, be entitled to receive them. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any department from distributing its own publications. Distributions to, or exchanges with, states shall be with the state libraries or the authorized exchange agencies of the states.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 959, §§ 1-3; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, §§ 7-9; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-5

.

29-1-6.
Disposition of duplicates and surplus supplies.

The state librarian, with the consent of the secretary of state, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, exchange, or destroy all duplicate books, pamphlets, or other surplus supplies, which, in his or her judgment, are not available for use in the state library. All such fees shall be deposited as general revenue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 462, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-6

; P.L. 1988, ch. 374, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 98.

29-1-7 — 29-1-9.
Repealed.

29-1-10.
Legislative reference bureau — Functions.

There shall be in the state library, under the direction of the state librarian, a legislative reference bureau that shall collect, arrange, and place on file books, pamphlets, and other material relating to legislation; that shall prepare abstracts of laws in other states; and that shall present such other information as may be useful and necessary to the general assembly in the performance of its legislative duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1471, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-10

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 22.

29-1-11.
Expense of legislative reference bureau.

The state librarian shall, with the approval of the secretary of state, employ such assistance and incur such expenses as may be necessary in the proper administration of the legislative reference bureau, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary for this purpose.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the amount appropriated, or so much thereof as may be from time to time required, upon his or her receipt of proper vouchers approved by the state librarian and the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1471, § 2; P.L. 1908, ch. 1554, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 18; P.L. 1911, ch. 729, § 1; P.L. 1913, ch. 935, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1499, § 2; P.L. 1919, ch. 1747, § 2; P.L. 1920, ch. 1915, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 21; P.L. 1925, ch. 622, § 3; P.L. 1930, ch. 1600, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-11

.

29-1-12.
Appropriations for labor.

There shall be annually appropriated for labor in the state library, including cleaning, shifting, and sorting books, such sums of money as the general assembly shall deem necessary; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of all sums appropriated under authority of this section, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon his or her receipt of proper vouchers approved by the state librarian and the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 23; P.L. 1931, ch. 1792, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 22; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-12

.

29-1-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 23, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-13

; Repealed by P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 5.

29-1-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1404, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

29-1-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 404, § 1.

29-1-15.
Cooperation with federal officials.

The secretary of state is hereby empowered to cooperate with the Secretary of Education of the United States of America or any United States officer in carrying out the purposes of any and all acts of Congress for the benefit of those library services, including archives and records that are under his or her jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 22.